California, session 20252026, AB689.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 16590) is added to Part 4 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read: CHAPTER 8. Disaster Aid Assistance for Foster Children, Youth, and Families16590. (a) The Child Welfare Disaster Response Program is hereby created, and is to be administered by the department.(b) The Child Welfare Disaster Response Account is hereby created to fund the program.(c) Upon appropriation by the Legislature, moneys in the Child Welfare Disaster Response Account shall be used for purposes of the program and to support the needs of foster children and youth and their caregivers during a disaster.(d) For purposes of this chapter, “foster children and youth” means any of the following:(1) Children or nonminor dependents under the supervision of county child welfare agencies.(2) Wards placed in foster care under the supervision of county probation departments.(3) Children or nonminor dependents under the supervision of Indian tribes that have entered into an agreement pursuant to Section 10553.1.16590.1. (a) The department shall determine eligibility criteria for the allocation of funds to applicants.(b) A county child welfare agency, county probation department, or Indian tribe that has entered into an agreement pursuant to Section 10553.1 may apply for funds on behalf of foster children and youth and their caregivers under supervision of the agency, department, or tribe based on the eligibility criteria established by the department pursuant to subdivision (a).(c) Funds awarded pursuant to this chapter shall be available to meet the housing, clothing, transportation, and other tangible needs of foster children and youth and their caregivers that occur within 180 days of a local emergency proclamation by a local government or a state of emergency proclamation by the Governor.16590.2. It is the intent of the Legislature that the Child Welfare Disaster Response Account may be replenished at the start of every fiscal year.16590.3. Gifts, donations, and bequests may be made to the Child Welfare Disaster Response Account, subject to any conditions or restrictions from the department.16590.4. Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this chapter by means of all-county letters or similar written instructions from the department. These all-county letters or similar written instructions shall have the same force and effect as regulations.